New Jersey, session 221, A4175.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Attorney General shall review the Statewide use of force policy applicable to law enforcement officers every two years, or in such shorter time frame as the Attorney General may deem appropriate, and revise it as need may require. In reviewing and revising the Statewide use of force policy, the Attorney General shall give due consideration to, at a minimum, the following core principles: (1)  respecting the sanctity of human life and serving the community; (2) prioritizing other reasonable measures, including de-escalation, that must be attempted before resorting to the use of force; (3)  promoting the use of only objectively reasonable, necessary and proportional force, including the use of deadly force only as a last resort; and (4)  articulating other duties attendant to the use of force, such as a law enforcement officers duty to intervene, to render medical assistance, and to report and review uses of force. b.    The Attorney General shall transmit any revisions of the Statewide use of force policy to the chief or director of every county and municipal law enforcement department, every municipal and county prosecutor, and the Superintendent of State Police. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.